Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1809.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA CHILDREN'S MUSEUM.new text end new text begin $650,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $650,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to the Minnesota Children's Museum to create new opportunities for hands-on learning and expanded outreach into communities throughout Minnesota. new text end